apertium-iii.iii.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
 %{A%}:a %>:0

%{red%}:0
%{X%}:0
%{X%}:x
%{infx%}:0

%{L1%}:0
%{L2%}:0
%{L3%}:0
%{L4%}:0
%{L5%}:0

;

Sets

Vowels = i a o e u y ;
V2 = r e o ;
Tn = p x t ;
DbCons = b d g s j ;
Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;
HCons = m n l x ;
NCons = j r g z b d y;
MCons = g ;
SCons = h ;
CCons = h ;
ZCons = h ;


Rules

"{X} outputs as {x} before dde"
%{X%}:x <=> .#. [\:Vowels|:y]* :Vowels ([:r|:e|:o]) _  %>: :d :d :e .#. ;

"{X} outputs as {x} before su"
%{X%}:x <=> .#. [\:Vowels|:y]* :Vowels ([:r|:e|:o]) _  %>: :s :u .#. ;

!Tone change for monosyllabic noun/adj before reduplication

"{X} outputs as {x} before adjective reduplication to form alternative question or before noun reduplication to indicate quantity"
%{X%}:x <=> .#. [\:Vowels|:y]* :Vowels ([:r|:e|:o]) _  %>: %{red%}: ;




"H Deletion Rule"
h:0 <=> _ HCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

!"N Deletion Rule"
!n:0 <=> _ NCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

"M Deletion Rule"
m:0 <=> _ MCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

"S Deletion Rule"
s:0 <=> _ SCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

"C Deletion Rule"
c:0 <=> _ CCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

"S Deletion Rule"
z:0 <=> _ ZCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;


!"DbCons Deletion Rule"
!DbCons:0 <=> _ DbCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

!"DbCons Deletion Rule"
!DbCons:0 <=> DbCons: _ Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

!"HCons Rule"
!HCons:0 <=> h: _ Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

!"NCons Rule"
!NCons:0 <=> n: _ Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

!"MCons Rule"
!MCons:0 <=> m: _ Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

!"SCons Rule"
!h:0 <=> s: _ Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

!"CCons Rule"
!h:0 <=> c: _ Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;

!"ZCons Rule"
!h:0 <=> z: _ Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;


"Second Cons Deletion Rule"
Cx:0 <=> (Cy): _ Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;
         where Cx in Cons
               Cy in Cons
               matched ;



"Vowel Deletion Rule"
Vowels:0 <=>  Cons: _ ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;
              DbCons DbCons: _ ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;
              .#. _ ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: ;


!HCons Mapping Rules

"L1-h Mapping Rule"
%{L1%}:h <=> h: HCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: _ ;

!"L1-n Mapping Rule"
!%{L1%}:n <=> n: NCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: _ ;

"L1-m Mapping Rule"
%{L1%}:m <=> m: MCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: _ ;

"L1-s Mapping Rule"
%{L1%}:s <=> s: SCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: _ ;

"L1-c Mapping Rule"
%{L1%}:c <=> c: CCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: _ ;

"L1-z Mapping Rule"
%{L1%}:z <=> z: ZCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: _ ;

"L1-Cons Mapping Rule"
%{L1%}:Cx <=> Cy: DbCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: _ ;
              where Cx in DbCons
                    Cy in DbCons
                    matched ;

"L2 Mapping Rule"
%{L2%}:Cx <=> .#. Cy: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: %{L1%}: _ ;
              where Cx in Cons
                    Cy in Cons
                    matched ;

"L2 Double Consonant Mapping Rule"
%{L2%}:Cx <=> Cy: DbCons: Vowels: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: %{L1%}: _ ;
              where Cx in DbCons
                    Cy in DbCons
                    matched ;


"L3 Mapping Rule"
%{L3%}:Vx <=> Vy: ([:r|:e|:o]) (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: %{L1%}: %{L2%}: _ ;
              where Vx in Vowels
                    Vy in Vowels
                    matched ;

"L4 Mapping Rule"
%{L4%}:Vx <=> Vy: (Tn:) %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: %{L1%}: %{L2%}: %{L3%}:  _ ;
              where Vx in V2
                    Vy in V2
                    matched ;

"L5 (tone) Mapping Rule"
%{L5%}:Tx <=> Ty %>: %{infx%}: a: p: %>: %{L1%}: %{L2%}: %{L3%}: %{L4%}: _ ;
              where Tx in Tn
                    Ty in Tn
                    matched ;







! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
